Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.240

Collection rules—Use of "stamps."

The commission shall by rule or regulation prescribe the method of collection, and for that purpose may require stamps to be known as "Washington state fruit commission stamps" to be purchased from the commission and fixed or attached to the container, invoices, shipping documents, inspection certificates, releases, or receiving receipts or tickets. Stamps shall be canceled immediately upon being so attached or fixed, and the date of cancellation shall be placed thereon.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.28.240. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-32.]